District of Columbia statutes.
31-5607.09

Electronic filings.

(a)

The Commissioner may, by rule or order, prescribe acceptable methods for filing applications, forms, notices, prospectuses, registration statements, or other documents with the Department in electronic form.

(b)

The Commissioner may, by rule or order, prescribe acceptable methods for executing electronic signatures or otherwise for documents filed with the Department in electronic form.

(c)

An electronic signature used in connection with an electronic filing shall have the same legal effect as a manual signature.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 709
as added June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-150, § 2(l), 49 DCR 4238